Missouri, session 2026, HB2800.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 208, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 208.1000, to read as follows:
208.1000. 1. Subject to appropriation, the department of social services shall
establish a grant program to provide funds to senior-serving nonprofit organizations to
assist seniors in appealing property tax assessments.
2. The department shall develop an application for nonprofit organizations to
apply for grants which shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) The name, address, phone number, and email of the nonprofit organization;
(2) The director's name and qualifications;
(3) A summary of the type of services the nonprofit organization provides,
including the number of employees and the number of individuals served;
(4) The geographic reach of the services provided by the nonprofit organization;
and
(5) The specific program or plans for a program the nonprofit organization has
for assisting seniors with property tax appeals, including staff, experience in property
tax appeals or similar work, and how the nonprofit organization plans to conduct
outreach to senior citizens.
3. The department shall consider the following when awarding grants:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2800 2
(1) The nonprofit organization's ability to provide senior citizens with assistance
in appealing property tax assessments;
(2) The number of seniors the nonprofit organization is capable of serving;
(3) The level of need in the area that the nonprofit organization serves; and
(4) The funds available for awards.
4. The director may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔